Washington statutes.
RCW 43.216.705

Child care providers—Tiered-reimbursement system—Pilot sites.

(1) Subject to the availability of amounts appropriated for this specific purpose, the department shall implement the tiered-reimbursement system developed pursuant to section 6, chapter 490, Laws of 2005. Implementation of the tiered-reimbursement system shall initially consist of two pilot sites in different geographic regions of the state with demonstrated public-private partnerships, with statewide implementation to follow.

(2) In implementing the tiered-reimbursement system, consideration shall be given to child care providers who provide staff wage progression.

(3) The department shall begin implementation of the two pilot sites by March 30, 2006.

[ 2006 c 265 s 207; 2005 c 490 s 7. Formerly RCW 43.215.540, 74.15.350.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2005 c 409: "This act is necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, or safety, or support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and takes effect immediately [May 16, 2005]." [ 2005 c 490 s 15.]